North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06 Department of Human Services
50-06-32.1.
Autism spectrum disorder voucher program pilot project — Legislative management report — Appeal. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall establish a voucher program pilot project beginning July 1, 2014, to assist in funding equipment and general educational needs related to autism spectrum disorder for individuals below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level from age three to under age eighteen who have been diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder. The program may include funding for assistive technology; video modeling videos or equipment; language-generating devices; training and educational material for parents; parenting education; sensory equipment; tutors; safety equipment; travel tools; self-care equipment; timers; visual representation systems; respite care; specialized day care; language comprehension equipment; and registration and related expenses for workshops and training to improve independent living skills, employment opportunities, and other executive or social skills.

The department shall adopt rules addressing management of this voucher program pilot project and establishing the eligibility requirements and exclusions for this voucher program pilot project. The program may not provide a voucher for early intensive behavioral intervention, including applied behavioral analysis, intensive early interventional behavioral therapy, intensive behavioral intervention, the Lovaas method, the Denver model, LEAP (learning experiences - an alternative program for preschoolers and parents), TEACCH (treatment and education of autistic and related communication handicapped children), pivotal response training, or discrete trial training.

A decision on a voucher application which is issued by the department under this section may be appealed as provided under chapter 28-32.

The department shall report to the legislative management regarding the autism spectrum disorder program pilot project.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 206, § 2; 2015, ch. 46, § 13, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 398, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-33.
Dementia care services.

As used in this section, “dementia” means the condition of an individual involving loss of memory and impairment of cognitive functions severe enough to interfere with the individual’s daily life. The department shall contract with a private provider for a dementia care services program in each area of the state served by a regional human service center. The dementia care services must include:

Identifying available services within the region;

Providing information to medical professionals, law enforcement, and the public regarding the symptoms of dementia, the benefits of early detection and treatment, and the services available to individuals with dementia and their caregivers;

Assessing the needs of individuals with dementia and their caregivers;

Training care providers to manage and provide for the care of individuals with dementia;

Providing consultation services to individuals with dementia and their caregivers; and

Facilitating the referral of individuals with dementia and their caregivers to appropriate care and support services.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 414, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06-34.
Program for services to transition-aged youth at risk — Definition — Rules — Continuing appropriation.

The department shall develop, within current appropriations, a program for services to transition-aged youth at risk. The department shall use a wraparound planning process. The department shall adopt rules to establish eligibility, services, and a distinct statewide interagency advisory council on transition-aged youth at risk, with youth and family representation, and with regional subcommittees. For the purposes of this section, “transition-aged youth” means children and young adults at risk due to:

Deprivation or other activities resulting in youth being involved with the foster care or juvenile justice system;

Serious mental illness or serious disabilities that do not qualify the youth for developmental disabilities program management; or

Suicidal tendencies.

Services under the program must include:

Individualized assessments to determine the needs and appropriate services to individual transition-aged youth at risk;

Single plan of care to coordinate services among available service systems, emphasizing existing case management resources;

Independent living skills, including self-advocacy training;

Enhanced or extended vocational rehabilitation, including transition from education to employment and from secondary education to higher education;

In-home support, including mentors, individual and family training, and access to respite care; and

Development of a statewide independent living skills curriculum for youth and families.

Services to an individual youth must be appropriate to that individual and need not include all services of the program.

The department may accept and receive grants and other sources of funding for the development of a program for services to transition-aged youth at risk. All moneys received by the department as gifts, grants, or donations for the development of a program for services to transition-aged youth at risk under this section are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 415, § 1; 2017, ch. 331, § 12, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06-35.
Department of human services food assistance contracts. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall contract with a statewide charitable food recovery and distribution organization to develop and implement new methods of delivering charitable food assistance services in underserved counties, to include a mobile food pantry program and prepacked food basket program; expand the recovery of surplus food from the retail and wholesale food industry for distribution to charitable feeding programs; provide training, technical assistance, and equipment grants to community food pantries and emergency meal programs; and develop a cross-referral system between charitable feeding programs and government assistance programs that help clients achieve self-sufficiency.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 416, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-06-35.
Department food assistance contracts. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall contract with a statewide charitable food recovery and distribution organization to develop and implement new methods of delivering charitable food assistance services in underserved counties, to include a mobile food pantry program and prepacked food basket program; expand the recovery of surplus food from the retail and wholesale food industry for distribution to charitable feeding programs; provide training, technical assistance, and equipment grants to community food pantries and emergency meal programs; and develop a cross-referral system between charitable feeding programs and government assistance programs that help clients achieve self-sufficiency.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 416, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 399, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-36.
Developmental disability provider review. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 417, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 331, § 14, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-36.1.
Regional crisis support services for individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability.

The department shall establish regional crisis support services for individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability. The regional crisis support services teams shall provide timely crisis assistance to individuals with an intellectual or developmental disability.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 228, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

50-06-37.
Developmental disabilities system reimbursement project. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services, in conjunction with developmental disabilities community providers, shall maintain a prospective payment system based on a state-approved assessment.

The department shall maintain a steering committee consisting of no more than eighteen representatives from all interested providers which must include no more than two clients, no more than one family member of a client, a representative of the department, and a representative of the North Dakota protection and advocacy project.

The department may contract with a consultant to continuously improve, in collaboration with the steering committee, the payment system and the resource allocation model tying funding to the state-approved assessment.

The department shall conduct the standardized assessment of eligible individuals residing at the life skills and transition center.

Data must be analyzed by the steering committee, and the steering committee shall recommend to the department any rate adjustments, resource allocation modifications, or process assumptions, including the state-approved assessment.

The department and the steering committee shall report development activities and status information to an interim legislative committee.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 353, § 1; 2015, ch. 46, § 14, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 228, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 397, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 46, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 50-06-37 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 397, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2247; and Section 3 of Chapter 228, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1517.

50-06-37.
Developmental disabilities system reimbursement project. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department, in conjunction with developmental disabilities community providers, shall maintain a prospective payment system based on a state-approved assessment.

The department shall maintain a steering committee consisting of no more than eighteen representatives from all interested providers which must include no more than two clients, no more than one family member of a client, a representative of the department, and a representative of the North Dakota protection and advocacy project.

The department may contract with a consultant to continuously improve, in collaboration with the steering committee, the payment system and the resource allocation model tying funding to the state-approved assessment.

The department shall conduct the standardized assessment of eligible individuals residing at the life skills and transition center.

Data must be analyzed by the steering committee, and the steering committee shall recommend to the department any rate adjustments, resource allocation modifications, or process assumptions, including the state-approved assessment.

The department and the steering committee shall report development activities and status information to an interim legislative committee.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 353, § 1; 2015, ch. 46, § 14, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 228, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 397, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 400, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-38.
Review and limitation. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Intermediate care facility providers shall submit all facility construction or remodeling proposals to the department of human services prior to enactment of a contract for the completion of the project. The department of human services shall review all intermediate care facility construction or remodeling proposals and may limit allowable construction and remodeling costs to ensure the costs are reasonable and appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 12, § 10.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

50-06-38.
Review and limitation. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Intermediate care facility providers shall submit all facility construction or remodeling proposals to the department prior to enactment of a contract for the completion of the project. The department shall review all intermediate care facility construction or remodeling proposals and may limit allowable construction and remodeling costs to ensure the costs are reasonable and appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 12, § 10; 2021, ch. 352, § 401, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-39.
Expedited ratesetting process — Nursing and basic care facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 370, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 331, § 14, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-40.
Medication therapy management program.

The department shall establish a medication therapy management program available to Medicaid-eligible individuals in the medical and hospital benefits coverage group. The purpose of the medication therapy management program is to coordinate health care and improve the health of individuals in the identified health populations and to manage health care expenditures.

The department may involve physicians, pharmacists, and other health professionals in the program. Any physicians, pharmacists, and other health professionals who provide face-to-face or telephonic medication therapy management services to covered individuals in the identified health population are entitled to reimbursement.

The department may request the assistance of the North Dakota pharmacists association or a specified delegate to implement a formalized medication therapy program. This program must facilitate enrollment procedures, provide standards of care, enable consistent documentation of clinical and economic outcomes, and structure an outcomes reporting system.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 331, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective on January 1, 2016.

50-06-41.
Behavioral health services quarterly report. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall publish a quarterly report of all behavioral health services provided by or supported by the department. The report must include each type of behavioral health service, the number of clients served for each service, and the amount of state and federal funds budgeted and spent for each service. Data must be identified for behavioral health services by human service region and by mental health services provided to children, mental health services provided to adults, and substance abuse services.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 46, § 11, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective Date.

This section became effective January 1, 2016.

50-06-41.
Behavioral health services quarterly report. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall publish a quarterly report of all behavioral health services provided by or supported by the department. The report must include each type of behavioral health service, the number of clients served for each service, and the amount of state and federal funds budgeted and spent for each service. Data must be identified for behavioral health services by human service region and by mental health services provided to children, mental health services provided to adults, and substance abuse services.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 46, § 11, effective January 1, 2016; 2021, ch. 352, § 402, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-41.1.
Peer support certification.

The behavioral health division shall establish and implement a program for the certification of peer support specialists. In developing the program, the division shall:

Define a peer support specialist;

Establish eligibility requirements for certification;

Establish application procedures and standards for the approval or disapproval of applications for certification;

Enter reciprocity agreements with other states as deemed appropriate to certify nonresident applicants registered under the laws of other states having requirements for peer support specialists; and

Establish continuing education and certification renewal requirements.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 37, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

50-06-41.2.
Community behavioral health program.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall establish and implement a community behavioral health program to provide comprehensive community-based services for individuals who have serious behavioral health conditions.

In developing the program, the department shall:

Establish a referral and evaluation process for access to the program.

Establish eligibility criteria that includes consideration of behavioral health condition severity.

Establish discharge criteria and processes.

Develop program oversight and evaluation processes that include outcome and provider reporting metrics.

Establish a system through which the department:

Contracts with and pays behavioral health service providers.

Supervises, supports, and monitors referral caseloads and the provision of services by contract behavioral health service providers.

Requires contract behavioral health service providers to accept eligible referrals and to provide individualized care delivered through integrated multidisciplinary care teams.

Provides payments to contract behavioral health service providers on a per-month per-referral basis based on a pay-for-performance model that includes consideration of identified outcomes and the level of services required.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 37, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 403, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-41.2.
Community behavioral health program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish and implement a community behavioral health program to provide comprehensive community-based services for individuals who have serious behavioral health conditions.

In developing the program, the department shall:

Establish a referral and evaluation process for access to the program.

Establish eligibility criteria that includes consideration of behavioral health condition severity.

Establish discharge criteria and processes.

Develop program oversight and evaluation processes that include outcome and provider reporting metrics.

Establish a system through which the department:

Contracts with and pays behavioral health service providers.

Supervises, supports, and monitors referral caseloads and the provision of services by contract behavioral health service providers.

Requires contract behavioral health service providers to accept eligible referrals and to provide individualized care delivered through integrated multidisciplinary care teams.

Provides payments to contract behavioral health service providers on a per-month per-referral basis based on a pay-for-performance model that includes consideration of identified outcomes and the level of services required.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 37, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 403, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-41.3.
Behavioral health bed management system.

The department shall establish and maintain a behavioral health bed management system to improve utilization of behavioral health bed capacity. Public and private providers of residential or inpatient behavioral health services, except the department of corrections and rehabilitation, shall participate in and report daily to the department the information and documentation necessary to maintain the behavioral health bed management system in the form and manner prescribed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 12, § 27, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 551, § 3, effective November 12, 2021.

50-06-42.
Substance use disorder treatment voucher system. [Effective through June 30, 2022 — Retroactive application - See note]

The department shall establish and administer, within the limits of legislative appropriations, a voucher system to address underserved areas and gaps in the state’s substance abuse treatment system and to assist in the payment of addiction treatment services provided by licensed substance abuse treatment programs, excluding regional human service centers, hospital- or medical clinic-based programs for medical management of withdrawal, and any institution for mental diseases in accordance with subsection 2.

The department shall deny a licensed substance abuse treatment program’s substance use disorder treatment voucher system application and deny reimbursement by the substance use disorder treatment voucher system if the licensed substance abuse treatment program is an institution for mental diseases and reimbursement is requested for residential beds added on or after July 1, 2020.

Services eligible for the voucher program include only those levels of care recognized by the American society of addiction medicine, with particular emphasis given to underserved areas and programs. The department shall ensure that a licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers collects and reports process and outcome measures. The department shall develop requirements and provide training and technical assistance to a licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers. A licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers shall provide evidence-based services.

The department shall allocate funding appropriated for the substance use disorder treatment voucher as follows:

No more than forty-five percent of the appropriated amount may be allocated for residential substance use disorder services administered by licensed substance abuse treatment programs with more than sixteen beds.

The remaining appropriation must be allocated for residential programs with sixteen or fewer beds, nonresidential outpatient, and ancillary substance use disorder services administered by licensed substance abuse treatment programs.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 331, § 13, effective March 9, 2017; 2019, ch. 396, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 12, §§ 25, 26, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-06-42 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 25 of Chapter 12, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1012; Section 26 of Chapter 12, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1012; and Section 1 of Chapter 361, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1402.

Section 64 of chapter 25, S.L. 2021, provides: “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

Section 25 of this Act applies retroactively to July 1, 2020.”

50-06-42.
Substance use disorder treatment voucher system. [Effective July 1, 2022 — Retroactive application — See note]

The department shall establish and administer, within the limits of legislative appropriations, a voucher system to address underserved areas and gaps in the state's substance abuse treatment system and to assist in the payment of addiction treatment services provided by licensed substance abuse treatment programs, excluding regional human service centers, hospital- or medical clinic-based programs for medical management of withdrawal, and any institution for mental diseases in accordance with subsection 2. An out-of-state licensed substance abuse treatment program located within a bordering state may participate in the voucher program to serve an underserved area of this state pursuant to the rules adopted by the department. The department shall develop rules to include processes and requirements for an out-of-state provider to receive reimbursement only for outpatient and community-based services upon a provider completing an assessment of need and receiving approval from the department.

The department shall deny a licensed substance abuse treatment program's substance use disorder treatment voucher system application and deny reimbursement by the substance use disorder treatment voucher system if the licensed substance abuse treatment program is an institution for mental diseases and reimbursement is requested for residential beds added on or after July 1, 2020.

Services eligible for the voucher program include only those levels of care recognized by the American society of addiction medicine, with particular emphasis given to underserved areas and programs. The department shall ensure that a licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers collects and reports process and outcome measures.

The department shall develop requirements and provide training and technical assistance to a licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers. A licensed substance abuse treatment program, hospital, and medical clinic program accepting vouchers shall provide evidence-based services.

The department shall allocate funding appropriated for the substance use disorder treatment voucher as follows:

No more than forty-five percent of the appropriated amount may be allocated for residential substance use disorder services administered by licensed substance abuse treatment programs with more than sixteen beds.

The remaining appropriation must be allocated for residential programs with sixteen or fewer beds, nonresidential outpatient, and ancillary substance use disorder services administered by licensed substance abuse treatment programs.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 331, § 13, effective March 9, 2017; 2019, ch. 396, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 12, §§ 25, 26, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

50-06-42.1.
Substance use disorder treatment voucher system grants.
[Expires July 1, 2027]

A licensed substance abuse treatment program, excluding regional human service centers and hospital or medical clinic-based programs for medical management of withdrawal, may apply for a competitive substance use disorder treatment voucher system grant. A licensed substance abuse treatment program is eligible for a one-time grant award. To receive a grant, a licensed substance abuse treatment program shall:

Submit an application in the form and manner prescribed by the department;

Enter a grant agreement with the department;

Use grant funds for a licensed substance abuse treatment program with fewer than seventeen beds in an underserved area, as determined by the department, in the state’s substance abuse treatment system;

Use the grant funds to support the provision of substance use disorder treatment in underserved areas of the state’s substance abuse treatment system;

Provide and disclose information needed to comply with the department’s data collection requirements; and

Operate in compliance with grant requirements.

The department, within legislative appropriations, may distribute up to two grants under this section to licensed substance abuse treatment programs.

The department may recapture grant funds distributed to a licensed program found by the department to be out of compliance with the requirements established by the grant program, including ending or reducing the operation of the substance use disorder treatment services in the underserved area.

The department may not collect property, equipment, or supplies purchased with grant funds from the licensed substance abuse treatment program after successful completion of the terms of the grant.

The grant term must be for five years.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 12, § 24, effective July 21, 2021.

50-06-43.
Task force on children’s behavioral health — Membership — Duties — Reports to governor and legislative management. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 350, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 394, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

50-06-43.1.
Children’s cabinet — Membership — Duties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The children's cabinet is created to assess, guide, and coordinate the care for children across the state's branches of government and the tribal nations.

The children's cabinet consists of the following members:

The governor, or the governor’s designee;

The chief justice of the supreme court, or the chief justice's designee;

The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker’s designee;

The president pro tempore of the senate, or the president pro tempore’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee;

The director of the committee on protection and advocacy, or the director’s designee;

A representative of the tribal nations in the state, who is appointed by the governor; and

Four individuals representing parents, private service providers, or other community interests, who are appointed by the governor to serve a term of two years, at the pleasure of the governor, and who are entitled to reimbursement from the department of human services for travel and lodging at the same rate as provided for state officers and employees.

The chairman of legislative management, or a member of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management, shall serve as the presiding officer of the cabinet. The cabinet shall meet at least quarterly. Additional meetings may be held at the discretion of the presiding officer.

The children’s cabinet shall:

Coordinate broad-based leadership across programs, agencies, branches of government, and tribal nations to meet the needs of children;

Develop strategies to address gaps or needs regarding early care and education, medical and behavioral health, community, child welfare, and juvenile justice;

Develop strategies to provide for the full continuum of care in the delivery of services, including promotion, prevention, early identification and intervention, service delivery, and recovery;

Seek to engage cooperation across public and private service providers;

Provide a comprehensive vision for how and where children are best served, attending to children in a respectful and relevant manner;

Seek strategies to provide services to children without consideration of prior engagement with juvenile services;

Provide for the active participation of consumers and providers statewide on advisory committees; and

Receive information and recommendations from the department of human services, department of corrections and rehabilitation, and other state agencies.

The department of human services shall provide the children’s cabinet with staffing and administrative services.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 394, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 362, § 1, effective March 18, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 404, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-06-43.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 404 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 1 of Chapter 362, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1076.

50-06-43.1.
Children’s cabinet — Membership — Duties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The children’s cabinet is created to assess, guide, and coordinate the care for children across the state’s branches of government and the tribal nations.

The children’s cabinet consists of the following members:

The governor, or the governor’s designee;

The chief justice of the supreme court, or the chief justice’s designee;

The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker’s designee;

The president pro tempore of the senate, or the president pro tempore’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee;

The director of the committee on protection and advocacy, or the director’s designee;

A representative of the tribal nations in the state, who is appointed by the governor; and

Four individuals representing parents, private service providers, or other community interests, who are appointed by the governor to serve a term of two years, at the pleasure of the governor, and who are entitled to reimbursement from the department for travel and lodging at the same rate as provided for state officers and employees.

The chairman of legislative management, or a member of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management, shall serve as the presiding officer of the cabinet. The cabinet shall meet at least quarterly. Additional meetings may be held at the discretion of the presiding officer.

The children’s cabinet shall:

Coordinate broad-based leadership across programs, agencies, branches of government, and tribal nations to meet the needs of children;

Develop strategies to address gaps or needs regarding early care and education, medical and behavioral health, community, child welfare, and juvenile justice;

Develop strategies to provide for the full continuum of care in the delivery of services, including promotion, prevention, early identification and intervention, service delivery, and recovery;

Seek to engage cooperation across public and private service providers;

Provide a comprehensive vision for how and where children are best served, attending to children in a respectful and relevant manner;

Seek strategies to provide services to children without consideration of prior engagement with juvenile services;

Provide for the active participation of consumers and providers statewide on advisory committees; and

Receive information and recommendations from the department of health and human services, department of corrections and rehabilitation, and other state agencies.

The department shall provide the children’s cabinet with staffing and administrative services.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 394, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 362, § 1, effective March 18, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 404, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-43.2.
Commission on juvenile justice — Reports. [Effective until September 1, 2022]

The commission on juvenile justice is composed of:

Three members of the house of representatives, two of whom must be selected by the majority leader of the house of representatives and one of whom must be selected by the minority leader of the house of representatives;

Three members of the senate, two of whom must be selected by the majority leader of the senate and one of whom must be selected by the minority leader of the senate;

The governor, or the governor’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent’s designee;

The executive director of the department of human services, or the executive director’s designee;

The director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation’s division of juvenile services, or the director’s designee;

The executive director of the Indian affairs commission, or the executive director’s designee;

A director of juvenile court services, appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court;

A representative from the commission on legal counsel for indigents; and

The following members appointed by the governor:

A state’s attorney;

A representative of a children’s advocacy center; and

A representative of local law enforcement.

The chairman of the legislative management shall designate one of the members of the commission to serve as the presiding officer. The governor’s appointees serve at the pleasure of the governor. Excluding ex officio members, the term of a commission member is two years.

The commission shall meet at least four times per year at the times and locations designated by the presiding officer. The office of the governor shall provide staffing for the commission.

The commission shall:

Review chapters 27-20.1, 27-20.2, 27-20.3, and 27-20.4;

Gather information concerning issues of child welfare, including education, abuse, and neglect;

Receive reports and testimony from individuals, state and local agencies, community-based organizations, and other public and private organizations, in furtherance of the commission’s duties;

Advise effective intervention, resources, and services for children;

Report to the children’s cabinet; and

Annually submit to the governor and the legislative management a report with the commission’s findings and recommendations which may include a legislative strategy to implement the recommendations.

A member of the commission who is not a state employee is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees to be paid by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. A state employee who is a member of the commission is entitled to receive that employee’s regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses to be paid by the employing agency. A member of the commission who is a member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive per diem compensation at the rate provided under section 54-35-10 for each day performing official duties of the commission. The legislative council shall pay the per diem compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as provided by law for any member of the commission who is a member of the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 394, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 37, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 405, eff September 1, 2022; Repealed by 2021, ch. 363, § 2, eff August 1, 2025.; 2021, ch. 363, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-06-43.2 was amended 3 times and repealed by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 1 of Chapter 363, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1150; Section 405 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 37 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035; and Section 2 of Chapter 363, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1150.